Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-236
Town meeting; questions; vote required.

All questions upon motions made at town meetings shall be determined by a majority of the electors voting, and the presiding officer shall ascertain and declare the result of the votes upon each question.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 34, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 1020;

C.S.1922, § 922;

C.S.1929, § 26-236;

R.S.1943, § 23-236.